ani_morph_clitics.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# AGREEMENT
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON agrCL
<m>:в[m]
<f>:й
<inan1>:б
<inan2>:р
<an.sg>:б[sg]
<an.pl>:й[pl]

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# CLITICS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON clitics
<wh>:>ди
<wh>:>кIо
<wh>:>гъи
<q>:>диле
<q>:>кIоле
<q>:>ле
<q.pst>:>гъиро
<rep>:>лъоди
<rep>:>гъоди
<quot>:>гъоду
<quot>:>ду
<int>:>гу
<advz>:>гужа
<add>:>ло
<coll>:>ло
<com>:>лой
<equ>:>лъий
<sbd>:>лоду
<futimp>:>хъо
<attr>:>сси
